Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 4
K

INCHAFOONEE LAKE AUTHORITY

12-3-360 through 12-3-378.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1015, § 3/SB 344, effective May 14, 2008.

Editor's notes.

- This part was based on Ga. L. 1970, p. 3379,

§§

1-8; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015,

§

1524; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3,

§

12; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22,

§

12.